Wisconsin, session 2025, AB751.
do enact as follows:AB751,11Section 1. 196.20 (4) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB751,2,32196.20 (4) (a) 3. “Midcontinent independent system operation” has the 3meaning given to “Midwest independent system operator” in s. 196.485 (1) (ds).AB751,24Section 2. 196.20 (4) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB751,2,115196.20 (4) (c) 1. If an electric public utility has an approved fuel cost plan, the 6commission shall defer any under-collection or over-collection of fuel costs that are 7outside of the utility’s symmetrical fuel cost annual tolerance, as established by the 8commission, for subsequent rate recovery or refund. Fuel costs under this 9paragraph shall be calculated to account for the cost of purchasing and the revenue 10earned in selling electricity generation capacity that meets the requirements for 11capacity as established by the midcontinent independent system operator.AB751,2,1212